Utah statutes.
57-8-13.   Condominium plat to be recorded.
(1) (a)  Simultaneously with the recording of the declaration there shall be
recorded a standard size, original linen (21" x 31") condominium plat with
6-1/4" x 1-1/2" recording information block, which map shall be made by a
registered Utah land surveyor and shall set forth:
(i)  a description of the surface of the land included within the project,
including all angular and linear data along the exterior boundaries of the
property;
(ii)  the linear measurement and location, with reference to the exterior
boundaries, of the building or buildings, if any, located or to be located on
the property other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands;
(iii)  diagrammatic floor plans of the building or buildings, if any, built or
to be built on the property, other than within the boundaries of any
convertible lands, in sufficient detail to identify each convertible space and
physical unit contained within a building, including its identifying number or
symbol, the official datum elevations of the finished or unfinished interior
surfaces of the floors and ceilings and the linear measurements of the
finished or unfinished interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, and the
lateral extensions, of every such convertible space and unit;
(iv)  a description or delineation of the boundaries of any unit or
convertible space not contained or to be contained in a building or whose
boundaries are not to be coextensive with walls, ceilings, or floors within a
building, other than units located within the boundaries of any convertible
lands, including the horizontal (upper and lower) boundaries, if any, as well
as the vertical (lateral or perimetric) boundaries;
(v)  a distinguishing number or other symbol for every physical unit
identified on the condominium plat;
(vi)  to the extent feasible, the location and dimensions of all easements
appurtenant to the land included within the project;
(vii)  the label "convertible space" for each such space, if any;
(viii)  the location and dimensions of any convertible lands within the
condominium project, with each such convertible land labeled as such, and if
there be more than one such land, with each labeled with a different letter or
number;
(ix)  the location and dimensions of any withdrawable lands, with each such
withdrawable land labeled as such, and if there be more than one such land,
with each labeled with a different letter or number;
(x)  if with respect to any portion or portions, but less than all, of the
land included within the project the unit owners are to own only an estate for
years, the location and dimensions of any such portion, with each labeled as a
leased land, and if there be more than one such land, with each labeled with a
different letter or number; and
(xi)  any encroachments by or on any portion of the condominium project.
(b)  Each such condominium plat shall be certified as to its accuracy and
compliance with the provisions of this Subsection (1) by the land surveyor who
prepared or who supervised the preparation of the same and shall be executed
and acknowledged as provided in Subsection 57-8-10(8).
(2)  When converting all or any portion of any convertible land or when adding
additional land to an expandable condominium, the declarant shall record a new
or supplemental condominium plat which shall contain the information necessary
to comply with the requirements of Subsection (1) of this section.  In any
case where less than all of a convertible land is being converted, the
condominium plat shall show the location and dimensions of the remaining
portion or portions of the land in addition to otherwise meeting such
requirements.
(3)  When converting all or any portion of any convertible space into one or
more units or limited common areas and facilities, the declarant shall record,
with regard to the structure or portion of it constituting that convertible
space, a supplemental condominium plat showing the location and dimensions of
the vertical and horizontal boundaries of each unit formed out of this space.
The supplemental map shall be certified as to its accuracy and compliance with
this Subsection (3) by the land surveyor who prepared or who supervised the
preparation of it.
(4)  In interpreting the condominium plat or any deed or other instrument
affecting a building or unit, the boundaries of the building or unit
constructed or reconstructed in substantial accordance with the condominium
plat shall be conclusively presumed to be the actual boundaries rather than
the description expressed in the condominium plat, regardless of the settling
or lateral movement of the building and regardless of minor variance between
boundaries shown on the condominium plat and those of the building or unit.
